Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1132
Damage to premises; considered tort claim.

Any damage to the premises caused by the negligent or wrongful act or omission of any employee of the district while acting within the scope of his or her employment may be pursued as a tort claim as provided for in the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act. Any damage to the premises caused by the negligent or wrongful act or omission of any employee of the department while acting within the scope of his or her employment may be pursued as a tort claim as provided for in the State Tort Claims Act.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 32.

Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act, see section 13-901.

State Tort Claims Act, see section 81-8,235.